ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > 魚・水産用品 > 水槽・池用チューブ: エアライン; コイルチューブ; フレキシブルチューブ; 硬質チューブ; 標準チューブ
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 魚和水族用品 > 水族箱和水池用管路: 打氣管; 打氣管圈; 彈性打氣管; 硬式打氣管; 標準打氣管
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za ribe in vodne živali > Cevi za akvarije in ribnike: Zračne cevi; Cevni koluti; Upogljive cevi; Toge cevi; Standardne cevi
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Hal- és vízi kellékek > Akvárium- és tócsövek: Légcsövek; Tekercses csövek; Rugalmas csövek; Merev csövek; Szabványos csövek
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Suministros para peces y acuarios > Tuberías para acuarios y estanques: Tubos de silicona; Tubos en espiral; Tubos flexibles; Tubos rígidos; Tubos estándar
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для рыб и аквариумов > Трубки и шланги для аквариумов и прудов: Шланги для подачи воздуха; Шланги в бухтах; Гибкие шланги; Жесткие трубки; Стандартные трубки
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły i akcesoria dla rybek > Rurki do akwariów i oczek wodnych: Wężyki napowietrzające; Wężyki zwijane; Wężyki elastyczne; Wężyki sztywne; Standardowe wężyki
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre rybička a akváriá > Hadičky do akvárií a jazierok: Vzduchové hadičky; Špirálové hadičky; Flexibilné hadičky; Pevné hadičky; Štandardné hadičky
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Forniture ittiche e acquatiche > Tubi per stagni e acquari: Airlines; Tubi a spirale; Tubi flessibili; Tubi rigidi; Tubi standard
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Fiske- og vannutstyr > Rør til akvarier og dammer: Luftrør; Kveilerør; Fleksible rør; Faste rør; Standardrør
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za ribe i vodeni svijet > Crijeva za akvarije i jezerca: Zračna crijeva; Spiralna crijeva; Fleksibilna crijeva; Kruta crijeva; Standardna crijeva
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Zierfisch- Aquarien- und Teichbedarf > Schläuche & Rohre für Aquarien und Teiche: Luftschläuche und -rohre; Spiralschläuche; Flexible Rohre; Starre Rohre; Standardschläuche
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 鱼类和水族用品 > 水族箱/鱼缸管材: 气管; 螺旋管; 柔性管; 硬管; 标准管
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho cá & động vật thủy sinh > Hệ thống ống bể thủy sinh & ao nuôi cá: Ống dẫn khí; Ống cuộn; Ống mềm linh hoạt; Ống cứng; Ống tiêu chuẩn
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės žuvims ir kitiems vandens gyvūnams > Akvariumų ir tvenkinių vamzdžiai: Oro vamzdeliai; Spiralės; Lankstūs vamzdeliai; Standūs vamzdeliai; Standartiniai vamzdeliai
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 어류/수족관 용품 > 수족관/연못 튜브: 공기 관; 코일 튜브; 연질 튜브; 경질 튜브; 표준 튜브
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για ψάρια & υδρόβια ζώα > Σωληνώσεις ενυδρείων και λιμνών: Αεραγωγοί πιεσμένου αέρα; Σωληνώσεις σε κουλούρες; Εύκαμπτες σωληνώσεις; Άκαμπτες σωληνώσεις; Τυπικές σωληνώσεις
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Fisk och vattentillbehör > Akvarium och dammrör: Luftledningar; Spolarslangar; Flexibla slangar; Styva slangar; Standardslangar
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos aquáticos e para peixes > Aquários e tubos para tanques: Vias aéreas; Tubos em espiral; Tubos flexíveis; Tubos rígidos; Tubos padrão
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Peixes e suprimentos aquáticos > Tubos para aquários e tanques: Tubos de ar; Tubos de bobina; Tubos flexíveis; Tubos rígidos; Tubos padrão
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Kala- ja akvaariotarvikkeet > Akvaario- ja allasletkut: Ilmaletkut; Kierreletkut; Joustavat letkut; Jäykät letkut; Tavalliset letkut
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Benodigdheden voor vissen en water > Leidingen voor aquariums en vijvers: Luchtleidingen; Spoelleidingen; Flexibele leidingen; Stijve leidingen; Standaard leidingen
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Fisk og vandforsyninger > Slanger til akvarier og havebassiner: Luftslanger; Spoleslanger; Fleksible slanger; Stive slanger; Standardslanger
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์ทางน้ำและปลา > ท่อสำหรับตู้ปลาและบ่อน้ำ: ตัวสายอากาศ; ท่อคอยล์; ท่อยืดหยุ่น; ท่อแข็ง; ท่อมาตรฐาน
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Риби и артикули за акваристика > Тръби за аквариуми и изкуствени езера: Въздушни тръби; Навити тръби; Гъвкави тръби; Твърди тръби; Стандартни тръби
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Fish & Aquatic Supplies > Aquarium & Pond Tubings: Airlines; Coil Tubings; Flexible Tubings; Rigid Tubings; Standard Tubings
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru pești și acvaristică > Tuburi pentru acvariu și iaz: Conducte pentru aer; Tuburi înfășurate; Tuburi flexibile; Tuburi rigide; Tuburi standard
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Balık ve Su Malzemeleri > Akvaryum ve Gölet Boruları: Hava Yolları; Bobin Boruları; Esnek Borular; Sert Borular; Standart Borular
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro ryby a vodní živočichy > Potrubí k akváriím a jezírkům: Vzduchování; Spirálové hadice; Pružné hadičky; Pevné hadičky; Standardní hadičky
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Poissons et fournitures aquatiques > Tuyaux pour bassin et aquariums: Tuyaux à bulles; Tubes enroulés; Tubes flexibles; Tubes rigides; Tubes standards